Hawaii, session 2026, HB2349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that small businesses are the economic lifeblood of the State. The legislature further finds that despite increasing investments into the State's small businesses, there is limited publicly accessible information regarding new business registrants, making it challenging for these small business entities to connect with local resources and grow their businesses. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the director of commerce and consumer affairs to: (1)  Make certain contact information for newly registered entities available online; and (2)  Transmit the contact information to the business development and support division of the department of business, economic development, and tourism. SECTION 2.  Chapter 414, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§414-    Business registration; online availability; public information.  (a)  The department director shall make available online, as part of the department's business registration division database of public information, the following information for a newly registered entity: (1)  Name and contact information, including phone number; (2)  Electronic mail address; and (3)  Mailing address; provided that a newly registered entity shall opt-in in a manner prescribed by the department director in order for the information in paragraphs (1) and (2) to be made available online. (b)  Unless a newly registered entity affirmatively opts out in a manner prescribed by the department director, the department director shall transmit the information under subsection (a) to the business development and support division of the department of business, economic development, and tourism." SECTION 3.  Chapter 428, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§428-    Business registration; online availability; public information.  (a)  The director shall make available online, as part of the department's business registration division database of public information, the following information for a newly registered entity: (1)  Name and contact information, including phone number; (2)  Electronic mail address; and (3)  Mailing address; provided that a newly registered entity shall opt-in in a manner prescribed by the department director in order for the information in paragraphs (1) and (2) to be made available online. (b)  Unless a newly registered entity affirmatively opts out in a manner prescribed by the director, the director shall transmit the information under subsection (a) to the business development and support division of the department of business, economic development, and tourism." SECTION 4.  Section 415A-14.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§415A-14.7 Filing of documents, effective date.  The filing of documents required by this chapter to be delivered to the director for filing, and the effectiveness thereof, shall be governed by sections 414-11(d), (e), (f), (g), and (i), 414-14, [and] 414-16[.], and 414-  ." SECTION 5.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.